Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.260

Electronic monitoring with victim notification technology.

(1) The administrative office of the courts shall:

(a) Develop a list of vendors or enter into a contract with a vendor that provides electronic monitoring with victim notification technology. The office shall provide outreach to counties as to how courts may access the vendor or vendors; and

(b) Create an informational handout on the opportunity to request electronic monitoring with victim notification technology to be provided to individuals seeking a protection order and for which electronic monitoring with victim notification technology is available. The information must include a description of the technology used, requirements for accessing the technology, any limitations on how the technology may or may not assist the person in maintaining the safety of the victim and the victim's family, and how the person may request electronic monitoring with victim notification technology from the court.

(2) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability for damages resulting from the utilization of electronic monitoring with victim notification technology, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith.

(3) For purposes of this section, "electronic monitoring" means the same as in RCW 9.94A.030.

[ 2020 c 296 s 6.]

NOTES:

Short title—2020 c 296: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.